California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(5) “Technology constraints” means an inability of the tax preparation software used by a business entity to electronically file the acceptable return as required by this section as a result of the complex nature of the return or inadequacy of the software.

(c) Any business entity required to file a return electronically under this section may annually request a waiver of the requirements of this section from the Franchise Tax Board with respect to an acceptable return filed for a taxable year. The Franchise Tax Board may grant a waiver if it determines the business entity is unable to comply with the requirements of this section due to, but not limited to, technology constraints, where compliance would result in undue financial burden, or due to circumstances that constitute reasonable cause, and not willful neglect, as applicable with respect to the penalty imposed under Section
 19171.

(d) This section applies to an acceptable return required to be filed on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 478, Sec. 5.   (AB 2754)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

18622.

(a) If any item required to be shown on a federal tax return, including any gross income, deduction, penalty, credit, or tax for any year of any taxpayer is changed or corrected by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority, or where a renegotiation of a contract or subcontract with the United States results in a change in gross income or deductions, that taxpayer shall report each change or
 correction, or the results of the renegotiation, within six months after the date of each final federal determination of the change or correction or renegotiation, or as required by the Franchise Tax Board, and shall concede the accuracy of the determination or state wherein it is erroneous. For any individual subject to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), changes or corrections need not be reported unless they increase the amount of tax payable under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) for any year.

(b) Any taxpayer filing an amended return with the Commissioner of Internal Revenue shall also file within six months thereafter an amended return with the Franchise Tax Board which shall contain any information as it shall require. For any individual subject to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), an amended return need not be filed unless the change therein would increase the amount of tax payable under Part 10
 (commencing with Section 17001) for any year.

(c) Notification of a change or correction by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority, or renegotiation of a contract or subcontract with the United States that results in a change in any item or the filing of an amended return must be sufficiently detailed to allow computation of the resulting California tax change and shall be reported in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) For purposes of this part, the date of each final federal determination shall be the date on which each adjustment or resolution resulting from an Internal Revenue Service examination is assessed pursuant to Section 6203 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 56.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Applicable, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 987, to federal determinations that become final on or after January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18622.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 18622, if any item required to be shown on a federal partnership return, including any partnership-related item, is changed or corrected by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority, and the partnership is issued an adjustment under Section 6225 of the Internal Revenue Code or makes a federal election for alternative payment with the Internal Revenue Service as part of a Partnership Level Audit, the partnership shall report each change or correction to the Franchise Tax Board for the reviewed year within six months after the date of each final federal determination. The report of adjustments or return reporting the adjustments shall be sufficiently
 detailed to allow computation of the California tax change resulting from the federal adjustment and shall be reported in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Administrative adjustment request” means an administrative adjustment request filed by a partnership under Section 6227 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) “California share of the adjustments” means the adjustments described in subdivision (a), subject to the provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951) of Part 10 and the provisions of Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11.

(3) “Date of each final federal determination” means the date on which each adjustment or resolution resulting from an Internal Revenue Service examination is assessed pursuant to Section 6203 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) “Direct partner” means a partner that holds an interest directly in a partnership or pass-through entity.

(5) “Federal adjustment” means a change to an item or amount determined under the Internal Revenue Code that is used by a partner or partnership to compute state tax owed for the reviewed year whether that change results from action by the Internal Revenue Service, including a Partnership Level Audit, or the filing of a federal refund claim, or an Administrative Adjustment Request by the partnership. A Federal Adjustment is positive to the extent that
 it increases taxable income as determined under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or net income as determined under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and is negative to the extent that it decreases taxable income as determined under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or net income as determined under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(6) “Federal election for alternative payment” refers to the election described in Section 6226 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative to payment of imputed underpayment by partnership.

(7) “Indirect partner” means a partner in a partnership or pass-through entity that itself holds an interest directly, or through another indirect partner, in a partnership or pass-through entity.

(8) “Partnership level audit” means an examination by the Internal Revenue Service at the partnership level pursuant to Subchapter C of Chapter 63 of Subtitle F of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, which results in a federal adjustment.

(9) “Publicly traded partnership” means either of the following:

(A) A partnership that is a publicly traded partnership within the meaning of Section 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Any other partnership where more than 10 percent of the profits or capital interest is owned directly or indirectly by a partnership described in subparagraph (A).

(10) “Reallocation
 adjustment” means a federal adjustment that changes the shares of items of partnership income, gain, loss, expense, or credit allocated to direct partners. A positive reallocation adjustment means a reallocation adjustment that would increase state taxable income for direct partners, and a negative reallocation adjustment means a reallocation adjustment that would decrease state taxable income for direct partners.

(11) “Reviewed year” has the meaning provided in Section 6225(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(12) “Tiered partner” means any partner that is a partnership or pass-through entity.

(13) “Partnership-related item” has the meaning provided in Section 6241(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17024.5, and except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, any election made for federal purposes under the provisions of Subchapter C (commencing with Section 6221) of Chapter 63 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and a separate election shall not be allowed.

(2) In the case of any unitary partner whose distributive share of a partnership’s income and apportionment factors would properly be included in
 the computation of that partner’s business income (within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 25120) apportioned to California on that partner’s original California franchise or income tax return, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall not apply and instead such partner shall be treated as having filed an amended return within the meaning of Section 6225(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this section and that partner shall file an amended return to separately report its California share of the adjustments under Section 18622.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), and subject to the requirement of paragraph (2), a partnership may file a request, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, to make an election different from their federal election under this section,
 and the Franchise Tax Board shall grant such requests as specified in subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(B) In the case where an audited partnership or a tiered partnership makes a federal election for alternative payment, which requires adjustments to be taken into account by the partners, the Franchise Tax Board shall grant a request to make an election different from their federal election pursuant to subparagraph (A), provided that the partnership properly computes the amount of the tax due under the provisions specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(C) In the case where an audited partnership pays the tax at the federal level under Section 6225(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or a tiered partnership pays the tax at the federal level under Section 6226(b)(4)(A)(ii)(II),
 the Franchise Tax Board shall grant a request to make an election different from their federal election pursuant to subparagraph (A), provided the partnership is able to demonstrate to the Franchise Tax Board that the Franchise Tax Board’s ability to collect any state income or franchise taxes would not be impeded and the partnership properly follows the reporting provisions specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(4) (A) Each tiered partner and each indirect partner of an audited partnership shall be subject to the applicable election, reporting and payment requirements for audited partnerships and their direct partners under this section.

(B) Each tiered partner and indirect partner must make all reports and payments required to be made by such partners
 under this section no later than 90 days after the time for filing and furnishing statements to tiered partners and their partners, as required under Section 6226 of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations thereunder.

(d) (1) (A) If the change or correction described in subdivision (a) results in an increase of the amount of tax payable under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and if paragraph (2) does not apply, then a tax is hereby imposed on the partnership determined as follows, in lieu of taxes owed by its direct partners and indirect partners:

(i) Exclude from federal adjustments and any positive reallocation adjustments the distributive share of these adjustments made
 to a tax-exempt partner that is not unrelated business taxable income within the meaning of Section 23731.

(ii) Exclude from federal adjustments and any positive reallocation adjustments the distributive share of the adjustments made to a partner that has previously filed an amended return under Section 18622 reporting the distributive share and paid any additional state tax liability due.

(iii) With respect to any corporate partner or tax-exempt partner that is not excluded under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or clauses (i) or (ii), determine the total distributive share of all federal adjustments and positive reallocation adjustments, and apportion and allocate the adjustments as provided in Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11, and multiply that amount by
 the highest marginal tax rate provided in Sections 23151 or 23501, as applicable, for the reviewed year.

(iv) With respect to all tiered partners, nonresident individual partners, or nonresident fiduciary partners not excluded under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or clause (i) or (ii) or taken into account under clause (iii), determine the total distributive share of all federal adjustments and positive reallocation adjustments and compute the amount of California source income attributable to the adjustments as provided in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951) of Part 10 and the provisions of Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11, and multiply that amount by the highest marginal tax rate applicable to individuals for the reviewed year.

(v) With respect to
 all resident partners, resident fiduciary partners, or any other partners not excluded under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or clauses (i) or (ii) or taken into account under clauses (iii) or (iv), determine the total distributive share of all federal adjustments and positive reallocation adjustments that are subject to tax under subdivisions (a) or (c) of Section 17041, and multiply that amount by the highest marginal tax rate applicable to individuals for the reviewed year.

(vi) The total tax imposed under this paragraph shall be equal to the sum of the amounts determined under clauses (iii), (iv), and (v). The tax imposed under this subdivision shall be due and payable as provided in Section 19001 and treated as if imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(B) Penalties and interest, as applicable, shall be imposed under Article 6 of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19101) and Article 7 of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19131) from the original due date of the partnership return for the reviewed year.

(2) If the partnership makes a federal election for alternative payment under Section 6226 of the Internal Revenue Code, then the partnership shall file an amended California Nonresident Group Return for all nonresident direct partners under Section 18535 and pay the additional amount of tax due that would have been due had the federal adjustments been reported properly as required. For any partners not included in the amended California Nonresident Group Return, the amount reported to each partner shall be an adjustment to the partner’s share of partnership items as a result of
 the change or correction in subdivision (a) and each partner shall report any adjustments in accordance with Section 18622.

(e) Subject to the approval of the Franchise Tax Board, an audited partnership or tiered partner may enter into an alternative agreement with the Franchise Tax Board regarding any issue resulting from a federal audit adjustment, amended federal return, or administrative adjustment that would otherwise be subject to this section, including, but not limited to, the reporting and payment of tax, applicable time requirements, or any other provision that will provide, to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board, for the reporting and payment of any taxes, penalties, and interest due pursuant to this section.

(f) (1) If a partnership
 files a report or return as required under subdivision (a) after the six-month period specified in subdivision (a) or if the partnership or partner does not pay the tax required under subdivision (c) when due and payable, the Franchise Tax Board shall mail notice to the partnership of the deficiency proposed to be assessed pursuant to Section 19033. The deficiency proposed to be assessed must be mailed within four years from the date the change or correction was reported pursuant to subdivision (a), the return or payment was due, or within four years from the date the return was filed, whichever period expires later.

(2) If a partnership files a report, or files a return required under subdivision (a) within six months of the final federal determination, the Franchise Tax Board shall mail notice to the partnership of the deficiency proposed to
 be assessed pursuant to Section 19033. The deficiency proposed to be assessed must be mailed within two years from the date the change or correction was reported pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) If the partnership fails to file a report or return as required by subdivision (a), a notice of proposed deficiency assessment resulting from the federal determination may be made at any time.

(g) (1) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent the Franchise Tax Board from assessing direct partners or indirect partners for taxes they owe in the event that an audited partnership or tiered partner fails to timely make any report or payment required by this section for any reason.

(2) If a partnership’s report
 of the California tax changes resulting from the adjustments filed pursuant to subdivision (a) results in an overstatement of California taxable or net income, the adjustment shall be applied as follows:

(A) If the original adjustments were passed through to the partners under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the revised adjustment shall be passed through to the partners. The partnership shall file or amend the return as described in subdivision (a).

(B) If the tax on the adjustments was originally paid by the partnership under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the partnership may amend the return filed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) to claim a refund of that overpayment within the time periods provided by Section 19311. This subparagraph shall not allow a partnership
 to claim an overpayment for amounts not actually paid by the partnership.

(3) If properly reported and paid by the partnership or tiered partner, the amount determined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or similarly under an optional election, will be treated as paid in satisfaction of taxes owed by its direct and indirect partners on the same federal adjustments. The direct partners or indirect partners may not take any deduction or credit for this amount or claim a refund of the amount in this state. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a partner from claiming a credit against taxes paid to this state pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 18001) of Part 10 of Division 2, with respect to any amount paid by the partnership, or any amount paid by any tiered partnership that is a direct partner or indirect
 partner in the partnership, on that partner’s behalf to another state.

(h) (1) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section, including any requirements or procedures necessary to seek a written consent under paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations necessary or appropriate to implement the purposes of this section, including regulations to determine the California share of adjustments.

(i) A publicly traded partnership that
 is otherwise in compliance with this section shall not be subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). For purposes of the reporting requirements set forth in subdivision (a), a publicly traded partnership shall only be required to report their direct partners’ distributive share of a federal adjustment to the Franchise Tax Board. A publicly traded partnership shall be deemed to have made a federal election for alternative payment pursuant to Section 6226 of the Internal Revenue Code unless the publicly traded partnership files a request to make an election different from their federal election pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(j) In order to reduce the administrative burden on taxpayers that may be imposed by additional filings and payments that do not contribute materially to revenue, the Franchise Tax Board shall convene
 a meeting or meetings of interested parties for the purpose of determining appropriate de minimis partner reporting and payment requirements as the result of a partnership level audit.

(k) (1) With respect to an action required or permitted to be taken by a partnership under this section and a proceeding under this part with respect to federal adjustments arising from a partnership level audit or an administrative adjustment request, the state partnership representative for the reviewed year shall have the sole authority to act on behalf of the partnership, and its partners and indirect partners shall be bound by those actions.

(2) The state partnership representative for the reviewed year is the partnership’s federal partnership representative, unless the partnership
 designates in writing another person as its state partnership representative.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may establish reasonable qualifications for and procedures for designating a person, other than the federal partnership representative, to be the state partnership representative.

(l) This section shall apply to final federal determinations assessed pursuant to amendments made to Subchapter C of Chapter 63 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 29.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

18623.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board is authorized to provide, with respect to any amount required to be shown on any return, form, statement, or other document required to be filed with the Franchise Tax Board, that if the amount of the item is other than a whole dollar amount, either of the following shall apply:

(1) The fractional part of a dollar shall be disregarded.

(2) The fractional
 part of a dollar shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half dollar ($0.50) or more, in which case the amount (determined without regard to the fractional part of a dollar) shall be increased by one dollar ($1).

(b) Any person making a return, statement, or other document shall be allowed, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, to make the return, statement, or other document without regard to subdivision (a).

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not be applicable to items which must be taken into account in making the computations necessary to determine the amount required to be shown on a form, but shall be applicable only to the final amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18624.

(a) Section 6109 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to identifying numbers, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Identifying numbers shall be required on state tax returns, statements, or other documents in the form and manner as the Franchise Tax Board may require.

(c) Section 6109(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to identifying information required with respect to certain seller-provided financing, shall not apply.

(d) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, the Franchise Tax Board shall not require a
 nonresident alien who is not eligible for or has not been issued a federal social security number (SSN) or a federal individual taxpayer identification number (ITIN) to provide a SSN or ITIN in order to file a state tax return, statement, or other document required under this part. If a nonresident alien subsequently becomes eligible for and is issued a SSN or ITIN, the Franchise Tax Board may require the nonresident alien to provide a letter or other form documenting the nonresident alien’s SSN or ITIN.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “nonresident alien” shall mean a nonresident, as defined in Section 17015, who also meets the requirements of Section 7701(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 30.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

18625.

An income tax return preparer shall furnish a copy of any state tax return to a taxpayer and retain information in accordance with Section 6107 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18626.

For purposes of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 19701), which relates to criminal penalties in the case of fraudulent returns, the term “return” includes any return filed under this part using electronic technology pursuant to Section 18621.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18628.

(a) Section 6111 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disclosure of reportable transactions, applies, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a material advisor is required to send a duplicate of the federal return, if applicable, or the same information required to be provided on the federal reportable transactions return for California reportable transactions to the Franchise Tax Board not later than the
 date specified by the Franchise Tax Board or the Secretary of the Treasury.

(2) (A) The information provided to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to paragraph (1) shall also include any other information required by a Franchise Tax Board Notice.

(B) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any additional information requested under this section.

(c) Section 6111 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “Secretary or the Franchise Tax Board” for the word “Secretary” in each place it appears.

(d) The reportable transactions return requirements of this section shall apply to any material advisor with respect to any reportable
 transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code with respect to a material advisor that satisfies any of the following conditions:

(1) Is organized in this state.

(2) Is doing business in this state.

(3) Derives income from sources in this state.

(4) Provides any material aid, assistance, or advice with respect to organizing, managing, promoting, selling, implementing, insuring, or carrying out any reportable transaction with respect to a taxpayer that meets any of the following requirements:

(A) Is organized in this state.

(B) Does business in this state.

(C) Derives income from sources in this state.

(e) In addition to the requirements set forth in subdivision (a), for any transactions entered into on or after February 28, 2000, that become listed transactions (as defined under Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code) at any time, a return for those transactions shall be required to be filed with the Franchise Tax Board by the later of:

(1) Sixty days after entering into the transaction.

(2) Sixty days after the transaction becomes a listed transaction.

(3) Sixty days after the effective date of the act amending this section.

(f) In addition to the requirements set forth
 in subdivisions (a) and (e), for any transactions entered into on or after September 2, 2003, that are specifically identified by the Franchise Tax Board for California income or franchise tax purposes (under the authority of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 18407) as a “listed transaction” at any time, a return for those transactions shall be required to be filed with the Franchise Tax Board by the later of:

(1) Sixty days after entering into the transaction.

(2) Sixty days after the transaction becomes a listed transaction.

(3) Sixty days after the effective date of the act amending this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 42.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Information Returns [18631. - 18649.]

18631.

(a) This article does not apply to any payment of interest obligations not taxable under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(b) Except as otherwise provided, every person required to file an information return with the Secretary of the Treasury under any of the federal sections listed in
 subdivision (c) may be required to file a copy of the federal information return with the Franchise Tax Board at the time and in the manner as it may, by forms and instructions, require.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall apply to each of the following:

(1) Section 6034A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information to beneficiaries of estates and trusts.

(2) Section 6039 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns required in connection with certain options.

(3) Section 6039C of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns with respect to foreign persons holding direct investments in United States real property interests, if that person holds a direct investment in a California real property as defined in Section 18662.

(4) Section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information at source.

(5) Section 6041A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns regarding payments of remuneration for services and direct sales, except that no return or statement shall be required with respect to direct sales pursuant to Section 6041A(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) Section 6042 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns regarding payments of dividends and corporate earnings and profits.

(7) Section 6045 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns of brokers.

(8) Section 6049 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns regarding payments of interest.

(9) Section 6050H of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to mortgage interest received in trade or business from individuals.

(10) (A) Section 6050I of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to cash received in trade or business, etc., except that Section 6050I(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to cash received by criminal court, shall not apply.

(B) (i) The Attorney General shall, upon court order following a showing ex parte to a magistrate of an articulable suspicion that an individual or entity has committed a felony offense to which a federal information return is related, be provided a copy of a federal information return filed with the Franchise Tax Board under this paragraph. The Attorney General may make a return or
 information therefrom available to a district attorney subject to regulations promulgated by the Attorney General. The regulations shall require the district attorney seeking the return or information to specify in writing the specific reasons for believing that a felony offense has been committed to which the return or information is related.

(ii) Any information or return obtained by the Attorney General or a district attorney pursuant to this subparagraph shall be confidential and used only for investigative or prosecutorial purposes.

(11) Section 6050J of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to foreclosures and abandonments of security.

(12) (A) Section 6050K of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to exchanges of certain partnership interests.

(B) In addition to the general requirement under subparagraph (A), a transferor of a partnership interest shall be required to notify the partnership of that exchange in accordance with Section 6050K(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(13) Section 6050L of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to certain donated property.

(14) Section 6050N of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns regarding payments of royalties.

(15) Section 6050P of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to the cancellation of indebtedness by certain entities.

(16) Section 6050Q of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain long-term care benefits.

(17) Section 6050R of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to certain purchases of fish.

(18) Section 6050S of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to higher education tuition and related expenses.

(19) Section 6052 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns regarding payment of wages in the form of group-term life insurance.

(20) Section 6034(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns of split-interest trusts.

(21) Section 6039I of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns and records with respect to employer-owned life insurance contracts.

(22) Section 6039J of the
 Internal Revenue Code, relating to information reporting with respect to commodity credit corporation transactions.

(23) Section 6050V of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to applicable insurance contracts in which certain exempt organizations hold interests.

(24) Section 6050W of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns relating to payments made in settlement of payment card and third party network transactions.

(25) Any information return that is required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to a provision of Part III of Subchapter A of Chapter 61 of Subtitle F (commencing with Section 6031) of the Internal Revenue Code that is added to the Internal Revenue Code by a public law enacted on or after January 1, 2009.

(d) Every person required to make a return under subdivision (b) shall also furnish a statement to each person whose name is required to be set forth in the return, as required to do so by the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 42.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18631.7.

(a) Any check casher engaged in the trade or business of cashing checks that, in the course of that trade or business, cashes checks other than one-party checks, payroll checks, or government checks totaling more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in one transaction or two or more transactions for the same person within the calendar year, shall file an informational return with the Franchise Tax Board with respect to that transaction or transactions.

(b) The return required in subdivision (a) shall be filed no later than 90 days after the end of the calendar year and in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, and shall, at a minimum, contain both of the
 following:

(1) The name, address, taxpayer identification number, and any other identifying information of the person presenting the check that the Franchise Tax Board deems necessary.

(2) The amount and date of the transaction or transactions.

(c) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) Except as otherwise provided, “check casher” means a check casher as defined under Section 1789.31 of the Civil Code.

(2) “Checks” includes warrants, drafts, money orders, and other commercial paper serving the same purposes, including payroll checks, government checks, and one-party checks.

(3) “Government check” means a check issued by a federal, state, or local governmental entity and treated as a government check pursuant to Section 1789.35 of the Civil Code for fee-setting purposes.

(4) “Payroll check” means a check for wages subject to withholding pursuant to Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and treated as a payroll check pursuant to Section 1789.35 of the Civil Code for fee-setting purposes.

(5) “One-party check” means a check drawn upon the maker’s account and presented by the maker.

(d) With respect to a person who fails to file the report required by this section or fails to include all of the information required to
 be shown on that report, both of the following apply:

(1) Sections 6721 and 6724 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply, except that the “Franchise Tax Board” is substituted for the “secretary” in each place it appears in those sections.

(2) If the failure was willful, the person, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or, in the case of a corporation, not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment, together with the costs of prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 65.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18632.

Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code sets forth provisions administered by the Employment Development Department relating to the reporting, collection, refunding to the employer, and enforcement of taxes required to be withheld from wages paid by employers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18633.

(a) (1) Every partnership, on or before the 15th day of the third month following the close of its taxable year, shall make a return for that taxable year, stating specifically the items of gross income and the deductions allowed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001). Except as otherwise provided in Section 18621.5, the return shall include the names, addresses, and taxpayer
 identification numbers of the persons, whether residents or nonresidents, who would be entitled to share in the net income if distributed and the amount of the distributive share of each person. The return shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury, signed by one of the partners.

(2) In addition to returns required by paragraph (1), every limited partnership subject to the tax imposed by subdivision (b) of Section 17935, on or before the 15th day of the third month following the close of its taxable year, shall make a return for that taxable year, containing the information identified in paragraph (1). In the case of a limited partnership not doing business in this state, the Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe the manner and extent to which the information identified in paragraph (1) shall be included with the return required by this paragraph.

(b) Each partnership required to file a return under subdivision (a) for any taxable year shall (on or before the day on which the return for that taxable year was required to be filed) furnish to each person who is a partner or who holds an interest in that partnership as a nominee for another person at any time during that taxable year a copy of the information required to be shown on that return as may be required by regulations.

(c) Any person who holds an interest in a partnership as a nominee for another person shall do both of the following:

(1) Furnish to the partnership, in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of that other person, and any other information for that taxable year as the Franchise Tax Board may by form and regulation prescribe.
